Wyoming statutes. Title 15 Cities and Towns
Chapter 2 Incorporated Towns

Cross references. —

For general provisions applicable to cities and towns, see §§

15-1-101

to

15-1-1103

.

As to definition of “town,” see §

15-1-101

.

As to powers of governing bodies of cities and towns generally, see §

15-1-103

.

For constitutional provisions as to municipal corporations generally, see art. 13, §§ 1 to 5, Wyo. Const.

As to county organization, see §§

18-1-301

to

18-1-320

.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

56 Am. Jur. 2d Municipal Corporations § 1 et seq.